District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Distribution of False Sexual Imagery Prohibition Amendment Act of
2025.”.
Sec. 2. The Criminalization of Non-Consensual Pornography Act of 2014, effective May
7, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-275; D.C. Official Code § 22-3051 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 22-3051) is amended by adding new paragraphs (1A)
and (1B) to read as follows:


“(1A) “Distribute” means granting another person the ability to exercise dominion
and control over the image.
“(1B) “False sexual image” means a sexual image or audio recording created or
altered through the use of digital technology that a reasonable person would believe it depicts
speech or conduct of the person depicted and the production of which was substantially
dependent upon technical means, rather than the ability of another person to physically or
verbally impersonate such individual.”.
(b) A new section 5a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 5a. Unlawful distribution of false sexual imagery.
“(a)(1) First-degree unlawful distribution of false sexual imagery — It shall be unlawful
in the District of Columbia for a person to knowingly distribute or disclose one or more false
sexual images of another identified or identifiable person when, in addition to satisfying the
elements described in subsection (b)(1) of this section, the person commits the violation:
“(A) Within 5 years of one or more prior convictions of unlawful
distribution of false sexual imagery under this section;
“(B) With the intent to cause violence or bodily harm; or
“(C) Is reckless as to the fact that the person depicted is:
“(i) Under 16 years of age and the defendant is at least 4 years
older than the person depicted; or
“(ii) Under 18 years of age and the defendant is at least 4 years
older than the complainant and in a position of trust with or authority over the person depicted.
“(2) A person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in section 101 of the Criminal Fine


Proportionality Amendment Act of 2012, effective June 11, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-317; D.C.
Official Code § 22-3571.01), imprisoned for not more than 2 years, or both.
“(b)(1) Second-degree unlawful distribution of false sexual imagery — It shall be
unlawful in the District of Columbia for a person to knowingly distribute or disclose one or more
false sexual images of another identified or identifiable person when:
“(A) It is to a person other than the person depicted, including making the
image accessible on the internet to a person other than the person being depicted;
“(B) The person depicted did not consent to the disclosure or distribution
of the false sexual image; and
“(C) The person discloses or distributed the false sexual image with the
intent to;
“(i) Alarm, sexually abuse, humiliate, harass, or degrade the person
depicted;
“(ii) Sexually arouse or gratify a person; or
“(iii) Receive financial gain as a result of the distribution or
display.
“(2) A person who violates this subsection shall guilty of a misdemeanor and,
upon conviction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in section 101 of the Criminal
Fine Proportionality Amendment Act of 2012, effective June 11, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-317; D.C.
Official Code § 22- 3571.01), imprisoned for not more than 180 days in jail, or both.”.
(c) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code § 22-3055) is amended by adding a new subsection (c)
to read as follows:
“(c) A person is not guilty of unlawful distribution of false sexual imagery under section


5a if the person is a licensee and engaged in activities regulated pursuant to the Communications
Act of 1934, approved June 19, 1934 (48 Stat. 1064; 47 U.S.C. § 151 et seq.).”.
(d) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 22-3056) is amended by striking the phrase “or 5 if”
and inserting the phrase “5, or 5a if” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).